California statutes. Civil Code
Nothing contained in Section 2782 shall prevent a contractor responsible for the performance of a construction contract, as defined in Section 2783, from indemnifying fully a person, firm, corporation, state or other agency for whose account the construction contract is not being performed but who, as an accommodation, enters into an agreement with the contractor permitting such contractor to enter upon or adjacent to its property for the purpose of performing such construction contract for others.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.2.

(a) Nothing contained in subdivision (a) of Section 2782 prevents an agreement to indemnify a professional engineer against liability for the negligence of the engineer, or the engineer’s agents or employees, in providing inspection services to plants or other facilities if all the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The promisor is the owner of the plants or facilities inspected.

(2) The promisor is audited annually by an independent certified public accountant, public accountant, or accounting
 licentiate of another state authorized by the laws of that state to perform the audit.

(3) The net worth of the promisor exceeds ten million dollars ($10,000,000), as determined by the promisor’s most recent annual independent audit. The requirement of this paragraph shall be satisfied at the time the contract for indemnification is entered, and a subsequent reduction of the promisor’s net worth shall not void the obligation to indemnify.

(4) The promisor is self-insured with respect to liability arising from ownership of the plant or facility.

(5) The indemnification shall not be applicable to the first two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of liability.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not authorize contracts for indemnification of liability arising
 from willful misconduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 567, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.5.

Nothing contained in Section 2782 shall prevent a party to a construction contract and the owner or other party for whose account the construction contract is being performed from negotiating and expressly agreeing with respect to the allocation, release, liquidation, exclusion, or limitation as between the parties of any liability (a) for design defects, or (b) of the promisee to the promisor arising out of or relating to the construction contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 211, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.6.

(a) Nothing in subdivision (a) of Section 2782 prevents an agreement to indemnify a professional engineer or geologist or the agents, servants, independent contractors, subsidiaries, or employees of that engineer or geologist from liability as described in Section 2782 in providing hazardous materials identification, evaluation, preliminary assessment, design, remediation services, or other services of the types described in Sections 78125 and 78135 of the Health and Safety Code or the federal National Oil and Hazardous Substances Pollution Contingency Plan (40 C.F.R. Sec. 300.1 et seq.), if all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The services in whole or in part address subterranean contamination or other concealed conditions caused by the hazardous
 materials.

(2) The promisor is responsible, or potentially responsible, for all or part of the contamination.

(b) The indemnification described in this section is valid only for damages arising from, or related to, subterranean contamination or concealed conditions, and is not applicable to the first two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of liability or a greater amount as is agreed to by the parties.

(c) This section does not authorize contracts for indemnification, by promisors specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), of any liability of a promisee arising from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the promisee.

(d) “Hazardous materials,” as used in this section, means any hazardous or toxic substance, material, or waste that is
 or becomes subject to regulation by any agency of the state, any municipality or political subdivision of the state, or the United States. “Hazardous materials” includes, but is not limited to, any material or substance that is any of the following:

(1) A hazardous substance, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 78075 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Hazardous material, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 25501 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A regulated substance, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Hazardous waste, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Extremely hazardous waste, as defined in Section
 25115 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) Petroleum.

(7) Asbestos.

(8) Designated as a hazardous substance for purposes of Section 311 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1321).

(9) Hazardous waste, as defined by subsection (5) of Section 1004 of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6903).

(10) A hazardous substance, as defined by subsection (14) of Section 101 of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601).

(11) A regulated substance, as defined by subsection (7)
 of Section 9001 of the federal Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6991).

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter, modify, or otherwise affect the liability of the promisor or promisee, under an indemnity agreement meeting the criteria of this section, to third parties for damages for death or bodily injury to persons, injury to property, or any other loss, damage, or expense.

(f) This section does not apply to public entities, as defined by Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 6.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.8.

(a) For all contracts, and amendments thereto, entered into on or after January 1, 2018, for design professional services, all provisions, clauses, covenants, and agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any such contract, and amendments thereto, that purport to indemnify, including the duty and the cost to defend, the indemnitee by a design professional against liability for claims against the indemnitee,
 are unenforceable, except to the extent that the claims against the indemnitee arise out of, pertain to, or relate to the negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct of the design professional. In no event shall the cost to defend charged to the design professional exceed the design professional’s proportionate percentage of fault. However, notwithstanding the previous sentence, in the event one or more defendants is unable to pay its share of defense costs due to bankruptcy or dissolution of the business, the design professional shall meet and confer with other parties regarding unpaid defense costs. The duty to indemnify, including the duty and the cost to defend, is limited as provided in this section. This section shall not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or omission of the parties. Contractual provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements not expressly prohibited herein are reserved to the agreement of the parties.

(b) All contracts and all solicitation documents, including requests for proposal, invitations for bid, and other solicitation documents for design professional services are deemed to incorporate by reference the provisions of this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “design professional” includes all of the following:

(1) An individual licensed as an architect pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and a business entity offering architectural services in accordance with that chapter.

(2) An individual licensed as a landscape architect pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and a business entity offering landscape architectural services in accordance with that
 chapter.

(3) An individual registered as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and a business entity offering professional engineering services in accordance with that chapter.

(4) An individual licensed as a professional land surveyor pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and a business entity offering professional land surveying services in accordance with that chapter.

(d) This section shall apply only to a professional service contract, or any amendment thereto, entered into on or after January 1, 2018.

(e) The provisions of this section pertaining to the duty and cost to defend shall not
 apply to either of the following:

(1) Any contract for design professional services, or amendments thereto, where a project-specific general liability policy insures all project participants for general liability exposures on a primary basis and also covers all design professionals for their legal liability arising out of their professional services on a primary basis.

(2) A design professional who is a party to a written design-build joint venture agreement.

(f) Nothing in this section shall abrogate the provisions of Section 1104 of the Public Contract Code.

(g) Indemnitee, for purposes of this section, does not include any agency of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (SB 496)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.9.

(a) All contracts, provisions, clauses, amendments, or agreements contained therein entered into after January 1, 2009, for a residential construction project on which a wrap-up insurance policy, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11751.82 of the Insurance Code, or other consolidated insurance program, is applicable, that require an enrolled and participating subcontractor or other participant to indemnify, hold harmless, or defend another for any claim or action covered by that program, arising out of that project are
 unenforceable.

(b) To the extent any contractual provision is deemed unenforceable pursuant to this section, any party may pursue an equitable indemnity claim against another party for a claim or action unless there is coverage for the claim or action under the wrap-up policy or policies. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a builder or general contractor from requiring a reasonably allocated contribution from a subcontractor or other participant to the self-insured retention or deductible required under the wrap-up policy or other consolidated insurance program, if the maximum amount and method of collection of the participant’s contribution is disclosed in the contract with the participant and the contribution is reasonably limited so that each participant may have some financial obligation in the event of a claim alleged to be caused by that participant’s scope of work. The contribution shall only be collected when and as any such
 self-insured retention or deductible is incurred by the builder or general contractor and in an amount that bears a reasonable and proportionate relationship to the alleged liability arising from the claim or claims alleged to be caused by the participant’s scope of work, when viewed in the context of the entirety of the alleged claim or claims. Any contribution shall only be collected from a participant after written notice to the participant of the amount of and basis for the contribution. In no event shall the total amount of contributions collected from participants exceed the amount of any self-insured retention or deductible due and payable by the builder or general contractor for the claim or claims. However, this requirement does not prohibit any legally permissible recovery of costs and legal fees to collect a participant’s contribution if the contribution satisfies the requirements of this subdivision and is not paid by the participant when due.

(c) This section shall not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or omission of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.95.

For any wrap-up insurance policy or other consolidated insurance program that insures a private residential (as that term is used in Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2) work of improvement that first commences construction after January 1, 2009, the following shall apply:

(a) The owner, builder, or general contractor obtaining the wrap-up insurance policy or other consolidated insurance program shall disclose the total amount or method of calculation of any credit or
 compensation for premium required from a subcontractor or other participant for that wrap-up policy in the contract documents.

(b) The contract documents shall disclose, if and to the extent known:

(1) The policy limits.

(2) The scope of policy coverage.

(3) The policy term.

(4) The basis upon which the deductible or occurrence is triggered by the insurance carrier.

(5) If the policy covers more than one work of improvement, the number of units, if any, indicated on the application for the insurance policy.

(6) A good faith estimate of the amount of available
 limits remaining under the policy as of a date indicated in the disclosure obtained from the insurer.

(7) Disclosures made pursuant to paragraphs (5) and (6) are recognized to be based upon information at a given moment in time and may not accurately reflect the actual number of units covered by the policy nor the amount of insurance available, if any, when a later claim is made. These disclosures are presumptively made in good faith if the disclosure pursuant to paragraph (5) is the same as that contained in the application to the wrap-up insurer and the disclosure pursuant to paragraph (6) was obtained from the wrap-up insurer or broker. The presumptions stated above shall be overcome only by a showing that the insurer, broker, builder, or general contractor intentionally misrepresented the facts identified in paragraphs (5) or (6).

(c) Upon the written request of any
 participant, a copy of the insurance policy shall be provided, if available, that shows the coverage terms and items in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) above. If the policy is not available at the time of the request, a copy of the insurance binder or declaration of coverage may be provided in lieu of the actual policy. Paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) may be satisfied by providing the participant with a copy of the binder or declaration. Any party receiving a copy of the policy, binder, or declaration shall not disclose it to third parties other than the participant’s insurance broker or attorney unless required to do so by law. The participant’s insurance broker or attorney may not disclose the policy, binder, or declaration to any third party unless required to do so by law.

(d) If the owner, builder, or general contractor obtaining the wrap-up insurance policy or other consolidated insurance program
 does not disclose the total amount or method of calculation of the premium credit or compensation to be charged to the participant prior to the time the participant submits its bid, the participant shall not be legally bound by the bid unless that participant has the right to increase the bid up to the amount equal to the difference between the amount the participant included, if any, for insurance in the original bid and the amount of the actual bid credit required by the owner, builder, or general contractor obtaining the wrap-up insurance policy or other consolidated insurance program. This subdivision shall not apply if the owner, builder, or general contractor obtaining the wrap-up insurance policy or other consolidated insurance program did not require the subcontractor to offset the original bid amount with a deduction for the wrap-up insurance policy or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 467, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.96.

If an owner, builder, or general contractor obtains a wrap-up insurance policy or other consolidated insurance program for a public work as defined in Section 1720 of the Labor Code or any other project other than residential construction, as that term is used in Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2, that is put out for bid after January 1, 2009, the following shall apply:

(a) The total amount or method of calculation of any credit or compensation for premium required from a subcontractor or other participant for that policy shall be clearly delineated in the bid documents.

(b) The named insured, to the extent known, shall disclose to the subcontractor or other participant in the contract documents the policy limits, known exclusions, and the length of time the policy is intended to remain in effect. In addition, upon written request, once available, the named insured shall provide copies of insurance policies to all those who are covered by the policy. Until such time as the policies are available, the named insured may also satisfy the disclosure requirements of this subdivision by providing the subcontractor or other participant with a copy of the insurance binder or declaration of coverage. Any party receiving a copy of the policy, binder, or
 declaration shall not disclose it to third parties other than the participant’s insurance broker or attorney unless required to do so by law. The participant’s insurance broker or attorney may not disclose the policy, binder, or declaration to any third party unless required to do so by law.

(c) The disclosure requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to an insurance policy purchased by an owner, builder, or general contractor that provides additional coverage beyond what was contained in the original wrap-up policy or other consolidated insurance program if no credit or compensation for premium is required of the subcontractor for the additional insurance policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 37.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2783.

As used in Sections 2782 and 2782.5, “construction contract” is defined as any agreement or understanding, written or oral, respecting the construction, surveying, design, specifications, alteration, repair, improvement, renovation, maintenance, removal of or demolition of any building, highway, road, parking facility, bridge, water line, sewer line, oil line, gas line, electric utility transmission or distribution line,
 railroad, airport, pier or dock, excavation or other structure, appurtenance, development or other improvement to real or personal property, or an agreement to perform any portion thereof or any act collateral thereto, or to perform any service reasonably related thereto, including, but not limited to, the erection of all structures or performance of work in connection therewith, electrical power line clearing, tree trimming, vegetation maintenance, the rental of all equipment, all incidental transportation, moving, lifting, crane and rigging service and other goods and services furnished in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 707, Sec. 4.   (SB 474)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2784.

As used in Sections 2782 and 2782.5, a “design defect” is defined as a condition arising out of its design which renders a structure, item of equipment or machinery or any other similar object, movable or immovable, when constructed substantially in accordance with its design, inherently unfit, either wholly or in part, for its intended use or which impairs or renders the use of such structure, equipment, machinery or property dangerous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1327.)
-------------------------------------------

2784.5.

Any provision, promise, agreement, clause, or covenant contained in, collateral to, or affecting any hauling, trucking, or cartage contract or agreement is against public policy, void and unenforceable if it purports to indemnify the promisee against liability for any of the following damages which are caused by the sole negligence or willful misconduct of the promisee, agents, servants, or the independent contractors directly responsible to the promisee, except when such agents, servants, or independent contractors are under the direct supervision and control of the promisor:

(a) Damages arising out of
 bodily injury or death to persons.

(b) Damage to property.

(c) Any other damage or expense arising under either (a) or (b).

This section shall not affect the validity of any insurance contract, workmen’s compensation insurance contract, or agreement issued by an admitted insurer as defined by Sections 23 and 24 of the Insurance Code or insurance effected by surplus line brokers under Sections 1760 through 1780 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 13. SURETYSHIP [2787. - 2856.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition of Suretyship [2787. - 2788.]

2787.

The distinction between sureties and guarantors is hereby abolished. The terms and their derivatives, wherever used in this code or in any other statute or law of this state now in force or hereafter enacted, shall have the same meaning as defined in this section. A surety or guarantor is one who promises to answer for the debt, default, or miscarriage of another, or hypothecates property as security therefor. Guaranties of collection and continuing guaranties are forms of suretyship obligations, and except in so far as necessary in order to give effect to
provisions specially relating thereto, shall be subject to all provisions of law relating to suretyships in general. A letter of credit is not a form of suretyship obligation. For purposes of this section, the term “letter of credit” means a “letter of credit” as defined in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 5102 of the Commercial Code whether or not the engagement is governed by Division 5 (commencing with Section 5101) of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2788.

A person may become surety even without the knowledge or consent of the principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Creation of Suretyship [2792. - 2795.]

2792.

Where a suretyship obligation is entered into at the same time with the original obligation, or with the acceptance of the latter by the creditor, and forms with that obligation a part of the consideration to him, no other consideration need exist. In all other cases there must be a consideration distinct from that of the original obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2793.

Except as prescribed by the next section, a suretyship obligation must be in writing, and signed by the surety; but the writing need not express a consideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2794.

A promise to answer for the obligation of another, in any of the following cases, is deemed an original obligation of the promisor, and need not be in writing:

(1) Where the promise is made by one who has received property of another upon an undertaking to apply it pursuant to such promise; or by one who has received a discharge from an obligation in whole or in part, in consideration of such promise;

(2) Where the creditor parts with value, or enters into an obligation, in consideration of the obligation in respect to which the promise is
made, in terms or under circumstances such as to render the party making the promise the principal debtor and the person in whose behalf it is made, his surety;

(3) Where the promise, being for an antecedent obligation of another, is made upon the consideration that the party receiving it cancels the antecedent obligation, accepting the new promise as a substitute therefor; or upon the consideration that the party receiving it releases the property of another from a levy, or his person from imprisonment under an execution on a judgment obtained upon the antecedent obligation;

(4) Where the promise is upon a consideration beneficial to the promisor, whether moving from either party to the antecedent obligation, or from another person;

(5) Where a factor undertakes, for a commission, to sell merchandise and act as
surety in connection with the sale;

(6) Where the holder of an instrument for the payment of money, upon which a third person is or may become liable to him, transfers it in payment of a precedent debt of his own, or for a new consideration, and in connection with such transfer enters into a promise respecting such instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2795.

Unless notice of acceptance is expressly required, an offer to become a surety may be accepted by acting upon it, or by acceptance upon other consideration. An absolute suretyship obligation is binding upon the surety without notice of acceptance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Interpretation of Suretyship [2799. - 2802.]

2799.

In an assumption of liability as surety in connection with a contract, the terms of which are not then settled, it is implied that its terms shall be such as will not expose the surety to greater risks than he would incur under those terms which are most common in similar contracts at the place where the principal contract is to be performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.

A guaranty to the effect that an obligation is good, or is collectible, imports that the debtor is solvent, and that the demand is collectible by the usual legal proceedings, if taken with reasonable diligence.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2801.

A guaranty, such as is mentioned in the last section, is not discharged by an omission to take proceedings upon the principal debt, or upon any collateral security for its payment, if no part of the debt could have been collected thereby.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

In the cases mentioned in Section 2800, the removal of the principal from the State, leaving no property therein from which the obligation might be satisfied, is equivalent to the insolvency of the principal in its effect upon the rights and obligations of the guarantor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liability of Sureties [2806. - 2811.]

2806.

A suretyship obligation is to be deemed unconditional unless its terms import some condition precedent to the liability of the surety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

A surety who has assumed liability for payment or performance is liable to the creditor immediately upon the default of the principal, and without demand or notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2808.

Where one assumes liability as surety upon a conditional obligation, his liability is commensurate with that of the principal, and he is not entitled to notice of the default of the principal, unless he is unable, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, to acquire information of such default, and the creditor has actual notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2809.

The obligation of a surety must be neither larger in amount nor in other respects more burdensome than that of the principal; and if in its terms it exceeds it, it is reducible in proportion to the principal obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.

A surety is liable, notwithstanding any mere personal disability of the principal, though the disability be such as to make the contract void against the principal; but he is not liable if for any other reason there is no liability upon the part of the principal at the time of the execution of the contract, or the liability of the principal thereafter ceases, unless the surety has assumed liability with knowledge of the existence of the defense. Where the principal is not liable because of mere personal disability, recovery back by the creditor of any res which formed all or part of the consideration for the contract shall have the effect upon the liability of the surety
which is attributed to the recovery back of such a res under the law of sales generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.

Any party required to give a bond undertaking or other obligation may agree with his surety for the deposit of any money and assets for which the surety is responsible with a bank, savings bank, safe deposit, or trust company authorized by law to do business as such, or other depository approved by the court or a judge thereof, if such deposit is otherwise proper, for the safekeeping of such money and assets and in such manner as to prevent the withdrawal of any or all such money and assets without the written consent of the surety, or an order of court or a judge thereof, made on such notice to the surety as the court or judge may direct. Such agreement shall not in any
manner release, or change the liability of, the principal or surety as established by the terms of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Continuing Guaranty [2814. - 2815.]

2814.

A guaranty relating to a future liability of the principal, under successive transactions, which either continue his liability or from time to time renew it after it has been satisfied, is called a continuing guaranty.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

A continuing guaranty may be revoked at any time by the guarantor, in respect to future transactions, unless there is a continuing consideration as to such transactions which he does not renounce.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exoneration of Sureties [2819. - 2825.]

2819.

A surety is exonerated, except so far as he or she may be indemnified by the principal, if by any act of the creditor, without the consent of the surety the original obligation of the principal is altered in any respect, or the remedies or rights of the creditor against the principal, in respect thereto, in any way impaired or suspended. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede subdivision (b) of Section 2822.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   Effective July 19, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2820.

That a promise by a creditor is for any cause void, or voidable by him at his option, shall not prevent it from altering the obligation or suspending or impairing the remedy within the meaning of the last section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2821.

The rescission of an agreement altering the original obligation of a debtor, or impairing the remedy of a creditor, does not restore the liability of a surety who has been exonerated by such agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2822.

(a) The acceptance, by a creditor, of anything in partial satisfaction of an obligation, reduces the obligation of a surety thereof, in the same measure as that of the principal, but does not otherwise affect it. However, if the surety is liable upon only a portion of an obligation and the principal provides partial satisfaction of the obligation, the principal may designate the portion of the obligation that is to be satisfied.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section
2819, an agreement by a creditor to accept from the principal debtor a sum less than the balance owed on the original obligation, without the prior consent of the surety and without any other change to the underlying agreement between the creditor and principal debtor, shall not exonerate the surety for the lesser sum agreed upon by the creditor and principal debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 149, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2823.

Mere delay on the part of a creditor to proceed against the principal, or to enforce any other remedy, does not exonerate a surety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2824.

A surety, who has been indemnified by the principal, is liable to the creditor to the extent of the indemnity, notwithstanding that the creditor, without the assent of the surety, may have modified the contract or released the principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2825.

A surety is not exonerated by the discharge of his principal by operation of law, without the intervention or omission of the creditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Position of Sureties [2832. - 2856.]

2832.

One who appears to be a principal, whether by the terms of a written instrument or otherwise, may show that he is in fact a surety, except as against persons who have acted on the faith of his apparent character of principal. It is not necessary for him to show that the creditor accepted him as surety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.

In interpreting the terms of a contract of suretyship, the same rules are to be observed as in the case of other contracts. Except as provided in section 2794, the position of a surety to whom consideration moves is the same as that of one who is gratuitous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.

Notwithstanding the recovery of judgment by a creditor against a surety, the latter still occupies the relation of surety.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2839.]

Section Twenty-eight Hundred and Thirty-nine. Performance of the principal obligation, or an offer of such performance, duly made as provided in this Code, exonerates a surety.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2845.

A surety may require the creditor, subject to Section 996.440 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to proceed against the principal, or to pursue any other remedy in the creditor’s power which the surety cannot pursue, and which would lighten the surety’s burden; and if the creditor neglects to do so, the surety is exonerated to the extent to which the surety is thereby prejudiced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

2846.

A surety may compel his principal to perform the obligation when due.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2847.

If a surety satisfies the principal obligation, or any part thereof, whether with or without legal proceedings, the principal is bound to reimburse what he has disbursed, including necessary costs and expenses; but the surety has no claim for reimbursement against other persons, though they may have been benefited by his act, except as prescribed by the next section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2848.

A surety, upon satisfying the obligation of the principal, is entitled to enforce every remedy which the creditor then has against the principal to the extent of reimbursing what he has expended, and also to require all his co-sureties to contribute thereto, without regard to the order of time in which they became such.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2849.

A surety is entitled to the benefit of every security for the performance of the principal obligation held by the creditor, or by a co-surety at the time of entering into the contract of suretyship, or acquired by him afterwards, whether the surety was aware of the security or not.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2850.

Whenever property of a surety is hypothecated with property of the principal, the surety is entitled to have the property of the principal first applied to the discharge of the obligation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2854.

A creditor is entitled to the benefit of everything which a surety has received from the debtor by way of security for the performance of the obligation, and may, upon the maturity of the obligation, compel the application of such security to its satisfaction.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2855.

An arbitration award rendered against a principal alone shall not be, be deemed to be, or be utilized as, an award against his surety.

The intent of this legislation is to apply existing law to arbitration awards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 346.)
-------------------------------------------

2856.

(a) Any guarantor or other surety, including a guarantor of a note or other obligation secured by real property or an estate for years, may waive any or all of the following:

(1) The guarantor or other surety’s rights of subrogation, reimbursement, indemnification, and contribution and any other rights and defenses that are or may become available to the guarantor or other surety by reason of Sections 2787 to 2855, inclusive.

(2) Any rights or defenses the guarantor or other surety may have in respect of his or her obligations as a guarantor or other surety by reason of any election of remedies by the creditor.

(3)Any rights or defenses the guarantor or other surety may have because the principal’s note or other obligation is secured by real property or an estate for years. These rights or defenses include, but are not limited to, any rights or defenses that are based upon, directly or indirectly, the application of Section 580a, 580b, 580d, or 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure to the principal’s note or other obligation.

(b) A contractual provision that expresses an intent to waive any or all of the rights and defenses described in subdivision (a) shall be effective to waive these rights and defenses without regard to the inclusion of any particular language or phrases in the contract
to waive any rights and defenses or any references to statutory provisions or judicial decisions.
